src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_ata/neb/ni/akaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = hapata:hap
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ne V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ni N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:a ACT_COND_type ; 
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:ne VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:a V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:a INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:n ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_eta/neb/ni/ekaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = küpseta:küps
! V_OIGETA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ne V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ni N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:n ACT_COND_type ; 
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:e V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:e INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:n ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/ib/i/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = bruncta:brunc
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:i V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ;
 ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
 
: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_da/ib/i/gaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = barabanda:baraban, hobda:hob
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:i V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:i ACT_COND_type ;
:i ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:i VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/ab/oi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = kastta:kast
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:a ACT_COND_type ;
:a ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:a VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:o ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/eb/i/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = joksta:joks
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:e VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i


LEXICON V_2Syl_DVta/eb/i/DVkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = pagišta:pagiž
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:e VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ; !pagišta

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_1Syl_DVta/ub/i/DVkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = seišta:seiž
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:u V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:u N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:u ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ; !pagišta

!! preterite stem vowel
:u ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_1Syl_DVta/eb/i/DVkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = pesta:pez only for verbs with devoicing
! V_PESTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:e VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_t/k ; !DV devoice
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_1Syl_DVta/eb/i/ggaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = pesta:pez only for verbs with devoicing
! V_PESTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:e VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_te/tud/tas ; !DV devoice
: V-ConsonantStem_gaha/goi ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_kta/gub/gui/ggaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = kirkta:kir
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:gu V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:gu N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:gu ACT_COND_type ; 
:gu ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:gu VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:k V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:k INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:gu ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_kta/gib/gi/ggaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = henkta:hen
! V_HENKTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:gi V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:gi N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:gi ACT_COND_type ; 
:gi ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:gi VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:k V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:k INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:g ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i
