src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
ajelta+V:ajel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
ambelta+V:ambel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
andelta+V:andel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
eciskelta+V:eciskel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
huhtelta+V:huhtel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
jokselta+V:joksel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
joudelta+V:joudel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
jätelta+V:jätel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
kacelta+V:kacel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
kastelta+V:kastel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
katelta+V:katel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
keralta+V:keral V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
kändelta+V:kändel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
käskelta+V:käskel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
kävelta+V:kävel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
kükselta+V:küksel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
küpseta+V:küps V_eta/neb/ni/ekaha ;
küzelta+V:küzel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
lehtelta+V:lehtel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
mujelta+V:mujel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
muštelta+V:muštel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
ohdelta+V:ohdel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
ombelta+V:ombel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
panelta+V:panel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
peitelta+V:peitel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
pesta+V:pez V_1Syl_DVta/eb/i/DVkaha ;
noust+V:nouz V_1Syl_DVta/eb/i/DVkaha ;
pezelta+V:pezel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
pidelta+V:pidel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
pohtelta+V:pohtel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
ridelta+V:ridel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
riidelta+V:riidel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
salelta+V:salel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
samalta+V:samal V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
sanelta+V:sanel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
voidelta+V:voidel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
sidelta+V:sidel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
sirdelta+V:sirdel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
tacelta+V:tacel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
taskelta+V:taskel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
tegelta+V:tegel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
vedelta+V:vedel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
vihelta+v1+V:vihel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
čapelta+V:čapel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
čududelta+V:čududel V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
čukalta+V:čukal V_ta/eb/i/kaha ;
